Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.270

Dyslexia reporting requirements.

Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, as part of the annual student assessment inventory, school districts that screen students for indicators of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia must report the number of students and grade levels of the students screened, disaggregated by student subgroups. Each school district must aggregate the school reports and submit the aggregated report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the dyslexia advisory council convened under *RCW 28A.300.710 must use this data when developing best practice recommendations in accordance with RCW * 28A.300.710 and 28A.300.720.

[ 2018 c 75 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.300.710 expired August 1, 2023.